Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 14 Rhode Island Liquor Liability Act

3-14-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Liquor Liability Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-2.
Purposes.

Primary legislative purpose. The primary legislative purpose of this chapter is to prevent intoxication-related injuries, deaths and other damages among Rhode Island’s population.

Secondary purposes. The secondary legislative purposes are:

To establish a legal basis for obtaining compensation for those suffering damages as a result of intoxication related incidents in accordance with this chapter;

To allocate the liability for payment of damages fairly among those responsible for the damages, which will encourage liquor liability insurance availability; and

To encourage all servers of alcohol to exercise responsible serving practices.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following terms have the following meanings:

“Adult” means any person twenty-one (21) years of age or older.

“Intoxicated individual” means an individual who is in a state of intoxication as defined by this chapter.

“Intoxication” means a substantial impairment of a person’s mental or physical faculties as a result of drug or alcoholic beverage use so as to diminish that person’s ability to think and act in a manner in which an ordinary prudent and cautious person, in full possession of his or her faculties and using reasonable care, would act under like circumstances.

“Licensee” means the person to whom a license of any kind is issued by the local licensing authority and any person who is required to be licensed to serve or to permit the consumption of liquor.

“Liquor” means any intoxicating beverage which contains more than three and two tenths percent (3.2%) of alcohol by weight.

“Minor” means any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years.

“Person” means any individual, governmental body, corporation, or other legal entity.

“Service of liquor” means any sale, gift, or other furnishing of liquor.

“Visibly intoxicated” means a state of intoxication accompanied by a perceptible act or series of acts presenting an apparent sign or signs of intoxication.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-4.
Plaintiffs.

Except as provided in subsection (b), any person who suffers damage, as provided in §

3-14-8

, may bring an action under this chapter. This chapter shall not be construed to limit any currently existing common law or statutory right.

The following persons may not bring an action under this chapter against a defendant for negligently serving liquor to an individual, but may bring an action under this chapter against a defendant for recklessly serving liquor to an individual:

The intoxicated tortfeasor if he or she was at least twenty-one (21) years old when served by the defendant;

The estate of the intoxicated tortfeasor if he or she was at least twenty-one (21) years old when served by the defendant; and

Any person asserting claims arising out of the personal injury or death of the intoxicated tortfeasor if the intoxicated tortfeasor was at least twenty-one (21) years old when served.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-5.
Defendants.

The following persons who commit an act giving rise to liability, as provided in §

3-14-6

, may be made defendants to a claim under this chapter:

An alcoholic beverage retail licensee, and any employee or agent of this licensee; or

Any person who, at the time of an act giving rise to liability, as provided in §

3-14-6

, was required by law to have had an alcoholic beverage retail license under chapter 7 of this title and any employee or agent of that person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-6.
Liability for negligent service of liquor.

A defendant, as described in §

3-14-5

, who negligently serves liquor to a minor is liable for damages proximately caused by the minor’s consumption of the liquor.

A defendant, as defined in §

3-14-5

, who negligently serves liquor to a visibly intoxicated individual is liable for damages proximately caused by the individual’s consumption of the liquor.

Service of liquor to a minor or to an intoxicated individual is negligent if the defendant knows, or if a reasonable and prudent person in similar circumstances would know that the individual being served is a minor or is visibly intoxicated.

A defendant is not chargeable with knowledge of an individual’s consumption of liquor or other drugs off the defendant’s premises unless the individual’s appearance and behavior, or other facts known to the defendant, would put a reasonable and prudent person on notice of that consumption.

Proof of service of alcoholic beverages to a person under twenty-one (21) years of age without request for identification forms a rebuttable presumption of negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-7.
Liability for reckless service of liquor.

A defendant, as defined in §

3-14-5

, who recklessly provides liquor to a minor is liable for damages proximately caused by that minor’s consumption of the liquor.

A defendant, as defined in §

3-14-5

, who recklessly serves liquor to a visibly intoxicated individual is liable for damages proximately caused by that individual’s consumption of the liquor.

Service of liquor is reckless if a defendant intentionally serves liquor to an individual when the server knows that the individual being served is a minor or is visibly intoxicated, and the server consciously disregards an obvious and substantial risk that serving liquor to that individual will cause physical harm to the drinker or to others.

For the purposes of this chapter, the disregard of the risk, when viewed in light of the nature and purpose of the server’s conduct and the circumstances known to him or her, must involve a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable and prudent person would observe in the same situation.

Specific serving practices that are admissible as evidence of reckless conduct include, but are not limited to, the following:

Active encouragement of intoxicated individuals to consume substantial amounts of liquor;

Service of liquor to an individual who is under twenty-one (21) years old when the server has actual or constructive knowledge of the individual’s age; and

Service of liquor to an individual that is so continuous and excessive that it creates a substantial risk of death by alcohol poisoning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-8.
Damages.

Damages may be awarded for all injuries recognized under Rhode Island common or statutory law.

Punitive damages may be awarded in all actions based on reckless conduct, as set forth in §

3-14-7(c)

. Punitive damages may not be awarded for actions based on negligent conduct, as set forth in §

3-14-6(c)

.

Damages may be recovered under chapter 7 of title 10 and §

10-7-8

, as in other tort actions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-9.
Common law claims and defenses.

Common law claims and defenses applicable to tort actions based on negligence and recklessness in this state shall not be limited by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-10.
Settlement — Release — Contributions — Indemnity.

A plaintiff’s settlement and proper release of either the intoxicated tortfeasor or a defendant, as defined in §

3-14-5

, will not bar potential claims against any other defendant(s).

The amount paid to a plaintiff in consideration for the settlement and proper release of any defendant will be offset against all other subsequent judgments received by the plaintiff.

The liability of the intoxicated tortfeasor and any defendant, as defined in §

3-14-5

, who served alcoholic beverages, shall be joint and several.

In cases of negligent conduct, the intoxicated tortfeasor and any defendant, as defined in §

3-14-5

, who served alcoholic beverages have a right of contribution and not a right of indemnification.

In cases of reckless conduct, nonreckless defendants have a right of either indemnification or contribution from any reckless defendants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-11.
Statute of limitations.

Any action under this chapter against a defendant alleging negligent or reckless conduct must be brought within three (3) years after the cause of action accrues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-12.
Evidence of responsible serving practices.

Proof of defendant’s responsible serving practices is admissible as evidence that the server was not negligent or reckless. Responsible serving practices include, but are not limited to:

Defendant’s and defendant’s employees’ attendance at a server education training course; and

Defendant’s implementation, at the time of service, of responsible management policies, procedures, and actions.

Proof or disproof that the defendant was adhering to responsible serving practices is not by itself proof or disproof of negligence or recklessness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-13.
Privileges.

No licensee is liable for damages resulting from a good faith refusal to serve liquor to any individual who:

Fails to show proper identification of age;

Reasonably appears to be a minor; or

Is refused service in a good faith effort to prevent him or her from becoming visibly intoxicated.

No licensee is liable for retaining identification documents presented to the licensee as proof of the individual’s age for the purpose of receiving liquor provided:

Retention is for a reasonable length of time in a good faith effort to determine whether the individual is of legal age; and

The licensee informs the individual why he or she is retaining the identification documents.

This section does not limit a licensee’s right to assert any other defense provided by law.

A licensee may not be held liable under this chapter for failing to exercise any privilege provided in this section; however, this subsection does not provide immunity from liability under §§

3-14-6

and

3-14-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2.

3-14-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 158, § 2, effective June 30, 2011; P.L. 2011, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 12, 2011.

3-14-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 14, effective July 1, 1996.